Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.122

International baccalaureate diplomas.

(1) A student who fulfills the requirements specified in subsection (3) of this section toward completion of an international baccalaureate diploma programme is considered to have met the requirements of the graduation pathway option established in *RCW 28A.655.250(1)(b)(iv) and to have satisfied state minimum requirements for graduation from a public high school, except that the provisions of RCW 28A.230.170 regarding study of the United States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution apply to students under this section.

(2) School districts may require students under this section to complete local graduation requirements that are in addition to state minimum requirements before issuing a high school diploma under RCW 28A.230.120. However, school districts are encouraged to waive local requirements as necessary to encourage students to pursue an international baccalaureate diploma.

(3) To receive a high school diploma under this section, a student must complete and pass all required international baccalaureate diploma programme courses as scored at the local level; pass all internal assessments as scored at the local level; successfully complete all required projects and products as scored at the local level; and complete the final examinations administered by the international baccalaureate organization in each of the required subjects under the diploma programme.

[ 2019 c 252 s 110; 2011 c 203 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.250 was amended by 2023 c 349 s 2, changing subsection (1)(b)(iv) to subsection (3)(d). RCW 28A.655.250 was amended and recodified as RCW 28A.230.710 pursuant to 2024 c 66, changing subsection (3)(d) to subsection (2)(d).

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.